Maine, session 132, LD1841.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §943-C, first ¶, as amended by PL 2023, c. 640, §3, is further
amended to read:
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, after the foreclosure process
under sections 942 and 943 or sections 1281 and 1282 is completed and the right of
redemption has expired, if a municipality chooses to sell to someone other than the former
owner, the municipal officers or their designee shall use the sale process under subsection
3. For the purpose of this section, "former owner" means the owner or owners of record at
the time of foreclosure or, if deceased, the former owner's heirs, devisees or personal
representatives and "tax-acquired property" means real property taken by a municipality
for nonpayment of property taxes. If the municipality agrees to sell the property back to
the former owner, the alternative sale process under this section does not apply. If the sale
to the former owner is not completed, the requirements of this section are reinstated. As
an alternative to the sale process, a former owner may offer a deed in lieu of foreclosure.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §943-C, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 640, §3, is repealed
and the following enacted in its place:
2. Notification; appeal. This subsection establishes notice requirements.
A. At least 30 days prior to the foreclosure of the property, the municipal officers or
their designee shall send a notice by United States Postal Service certified mail, return
receipt requested, and first-class mail informing the owner of that property of the
amount of taxes due and the date of the foreclosure. The notice must include any
available property tax relief programs, including poverty abatement programs, and the
option of tendering to the municipality in which the property is located a deed in lieu
of foreclosure.
B. Within 30 days after foreclosure, the municipal officers or their designee shall send
a 30-day notice by United States Postal Service certified mail, return receipt requested,
and first-class mail informing the former owner of the foreclosed property of the total
amount required to redeem the property, the manner in which payment may be made
and of the opportunity to tender a release of interest deed.
C. At least 90 days prior to listing a property for sale, the municipal officers or their
designee shall send a written notice to the last known address of the former owner, by
United States Postal Service certified mail, return receipt requested, and first-class mail
of the sale process described in subsection 3. The State Tax Assessor shall prepare the
notices that must be used by municipalities to inform former owners of the sale process
provided under subsection 3.
Sec. 3. 36 MRSA §943-C, sub-§3, ¶A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 640, §3, is
further amended to read:
A. List Have the option to sell the property by a sealed bid process or list the property
for sale at the highest reasonable price at which the property is anticipated to sell with
a real estate broker or agent licensed under Title 32, chapter 114 who does not hold an
elected or appointed office in the municipality and is not employed by the municipality;
to manage the sale process. The sale process must require the municipality in which
the property is located to:
Page 1 - 132LR2426(01)

(1) Advertise the bid process on the foreclosed property in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county in which the property is located for 3 consecutive weeks;
(2) Establish a minimum bid reflecting what is owed to the municipality pursuant
to paragraph C;
(3) Require all bids to be sealed;
(4) Award the sale of the property to the highest qualified bidder; and
(5) Pay any excess funds to the former owner of the foreclosed property following
the process set forth in this subsection;
Sec. 4. 36 MRSA §943-C, sub-§3, ¶C, as amended by PL 2023, c. 640, §3, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (5) to read:
(5) Any other expenses incurred by the municipality in selling, maintaining,
demolishing or improving the property, including, but not limited to, documented
administrative costs and reasonable attorney's fees;
Sec. 5. 36 MRSA §943-C, sub-§4-A, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 640, §3, is
amended to read:
4-A. Effect of inability to contract or sell property. If, after 3 attempts, a
municipality is unable to contract with a real estate broker or agent for the sale of the
property as described in subsection 3 or the broker or agent is unable to sell the property
within 12 months after listing, the municipal officers may sell the property in any manner
authorized by the municipality's legislative body, as long as the municipality pays the
former owner any excess sale proceeds as calculated in subsection 3, paragraph C. If the
municipality elects to use a sealed bid process and the minimum bid is not reached after 3
attempts, the sealed bid process may be conducted without a minimum bid.
Sec. 6. 36 MRSA §943-C, sub-§7, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 640, §3, is amended
to read:
7. Retention of tax-acquired property. If a municipality chooses to retain a tax-
acquired property for municipal use or development, the municipality shall procure an
appraisal report from an appraiser licensed to provide real estate appraisals in this State
showing the value of the tax-acquired property being retained. The appraiser may not hold
an elected or appointed office in the municipality or be otherwise employed by the
municipality. The municipal officers, after providing the notice required by subsection 8,
shall pay the former owner any 10% of the excess sale proceeds as calculated in subsection
3, paragraph C, substituting the value of the tax-acquired property as shown in the appraisal
report, which must be prepared within 120 days before the time the excess sale proceeds
are paid, for the selling price of the tax-acquired property.
Sec. 7. 36 MRSA §943-C, sub-§9, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 640, §3, is amended
to read:
9. Notice by publication. If the municipality is unable, after reasonable diligence, to
locate the former owner of a tax-acquired property in order to send the notice required in
subsection 8, the municipality, once a week for 3 consecutive weeks, shall place a notice
in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the tax-acquired property is
located. The notice must include the name of the former owner, a description of the tax-
Page 2 - 132LR2426(01)

413 acquired property that was sold, the amount of the excess sale proceeds and the date by
424 which the excess sale proceeds must be claimed. The municipality may deduct from the
435 excess funds the cost to publish the notice required by this subsection.